en: E150a, Plain caramel, caramel color, caramel coloring
xx: E150a
ar: E150a, لون الكراميل
bg: E150a, Обикновен карамел
bs: E150a, Karamel boja
ca: E150a, colorant de caramel
cs: E150a, karamelové barvivo, karamelová barva
da: E150a, Madkulør, Sukkerkulør
de: E150a, Zuckerkulör, Zuckercouleur
el: E150a, Απλο καραμελοχρωμα
es: E150a, color caramelo, colorante «Color Caramelo», caramelo para licores
et: E150a, Tavaline karamell
fi: E150a, Sokerikulööri, Sokerikulööriä
fr: E150a, Caramel E150a, caramel ordinaire, Caramelo simple, caramel colorant
hr: E150a, obični karamel, karamel obični, bojila karamel, 150a, bojilo 150a
hu: E150a, Tömény karamell, karamell színezék
it: E150a, Caramello semplice, colorante caramello
ja: E150a, カラメル色素
lt: E150a, Paprastoji karamelė
lv: E150a
mt: E150a, Karamella naturali
nb: E150a, Sukkerkulør
nl: E150a, karamelkleurstof
pl: E150a, aromat karmelowy
pt: E150a, Caramelo simples, caramelo e 150
ro: E150a, Caramel simplu
ru: E150a, карамельный краситель
sk: E150a, Obyčajný karamel
sl: E150a, Navaden karamel
sv: E150a, Sockerkulör
tt: E150a, кәрәмил буягычы
vi: E150a, Màu caramel
zh: E150a, 焦糖色素

en: E150b, Caustic sulphite caramel, caramel E150b
xx: E150b
bg: E150b, Карамел основен сулфит, Каустично-сулфитен карамел
cs: E150b, Kaustický sulfitový karamel
da: E150b, Kaustisk sulfiteret karamel
de: E150b, Sulfitlaugen-Zuckerkulör, Karamell E150b, Sulfitlaugen-Zuckercouleur
el: E150b, Καυστικο θειωδες καραμελοχρωμα
es: E150b, Caramelo de sulfito cáustico, caramelo cáustico
et: E150b, Leeliseline sulfitkaramell
fi: E150b, Emäksinen sulfiittisokerikulööri, Emäksistä sulfiittisokerikulööriä
fr: E150b, Caramel de sulfite caustique, Caramel au sulfite de soude, Caramel E150b, E150b (caramel), E150b caramel, Caramel II, Caustic sulfite caramel, Caramelo cáustico de sulfito, Caramel au sulfite caustique, Caramel sulfité
hu: E150b, Szulfitos karamell
it: E150b, Caramello solfito-caustico
lt: E150b, Šarminė sulfitinė karamelė
lv: E150b, Sulfīta karamele
mt: E150b, Karamella tas-sulfit kawstiku
nb: E150b, Kaustisk sulfitert sukkerkulør
nl: E150b, Alkali-sulfietkaramel
pl: E150b, Karmel siarczynowy, Karmel kaustyczno-siarczynowy, Karmel zasadowo-siarczynowy, Karmel klasy II
pt: E150b, Caramelo sulfítico cáustico
ro: E150b, Caramel de sulfit caustic
sk: E150b, Kaustický sulfitový karamel
sl: E150b, Alkalni sulfitni karamel
sv: E150b, kaustiksulfitprocessen

en: E150c, Ammonia caramel, baker's caramel, confectioner's caramel, beer caramel, Caramel Color Ammonia, Ammonia caramel
xx: E150c
bg: E150c, Амониев карамел
cs: E150c, Amoniakový karamel
da: E150c, Ammonieret karamel
de: E150c, Ammoniak-Zuckerkulör, Ammoniak-Zuckercouleur
el: E150c, Εναμμωνιο καραμελοχρωμα
es: E150c, Caramelo amónico, El caramelo amónico, caramelo de panadería, caramelo de confitería, caramelo de cerveza
et: E150c, Ammooniumkaramell
fi: E150c, Ammoniummenetelmän sokerikulööri, Ammoniummenetelmän sokerikulööriä
fr: E150c, Caramel ammoniacal, Caramel E150c, E150c caramel
hr: E150c, amonijačni karamel
hu: E150c, Ammóniás karamell
it: E150c, Caramello ammoniacale
lt: E150c, Amoniakinė karamelė
lv: E150c, Amonija karamele
mt: E150c, Karamella tal-ammonja
nb: E150c, Ammoniert karamell
nl: E150c, Ammoniakkaramel
pl: E150c, Karmel amoniakalny, Karmel amonowy, Karmel klasy III
pt: E150c, Caramelo de amónia
ro: E150c, Caramel amoniacal
ru: E150c, Сахарный колер III, карамельный колер
sk: E150c, Amoniakový karamel
sl: E150c, Amonijev karamel
sv: E150c, ammoniakprocessen

en: E150d, Sulphite ammonia caramel, Sulfite ammonia caramel, Caramel Colour Ammonium Sulphite Process, Colour Sulphite Ammonia Caramel, Sulfite ammonia caramel, Colour E150d, Food Colour 150d, CAS 8028-89-5, acid-proof caramel, soft-drink caramel
xx: E150d
bg: E150d, Карамел амониев сулфит
cs: E150d, Amoniak-sulfitový karamel
da: E150d, Ammonieret sulfiteret karamel
de: E150d, Ammonsulfit-Zuckerkulör, Ammoniumsulfit-Zuckerkulör, Zuckerkulör E150d, Ammoniumsulfit-Zuckercouleur
el: E150d, Εναμμωνιο θειωδες καραμελοχρωμα
es: E150d, Caramelo de sulfito amónico, Caramelo sulfito de amoníaco, caramelo clase iv, Caramelo sulfito de amoníaco, caramelo a prueba de ácidos, caramelo de bebidas gaseosas, caramelo e150d
et: E150d, Ammooniumsulfitkaramell
fi: E150d, Ammoniumsulfiittimenetelmän sokerikulööri, Ammoniumsulfiittimenetelmän sokerikulööriä
fr: E150d, Caramel au sulfite d'ammonium, Caramel E150d, E150d (caramel), E150d caramel, Caramel IV - procédé au sulfite ammoniacal, Caramel IV, C.I. Natural Brown 10, FEMA no. 2235
hr: E150d, bojilo sulfitno amonijačni karamel, sulfitno amonijačni karamel, sulfitno-amonijačni karamel E150d
hu: E150d, Szulfitos ammóniás karamell
it: E150d, Caramello solfito-ammoniacale
lt: E150d, Sulfitinė amoniakinė karamelė
lv: E150d, Amonija sulfīta karamele
mt: E150d, Karamella tal-ammonja tas-sulfit
nl: E150d, Sulfiet-ammoniakkaramel
pl: E150d, Karmel amoniakalno-siarczynowy
pt: E150d, Caramelo sulfítico de amónia
ro: E150d, Caramel cu sulfit de amoniu
ru: E150d, карамель сульфата аммиака, сахарный колер IV, краситель сахарный-колер, краситель сахарный колер
sk: E150d, Amoniak-sulfitový karamel
sl: E150d, Amonijev sulfitni karamel
sv: E150d, ammoniaksulfitprocessen, sockerkulör E150d
tr: E150d, Sülfit amonyak karamel

en: E151, Brilliant black bn, black pn, E 151, C.I. 28440, Brilliant Black PN, Food Black 1, Naphthol Black, C.I. Food Brown 1, Brilliant Black A
xx: E151
bg: E151, Брилянтно черно bn, черно pn
ca: E151, Negre brillant BN
cs: E151, Čerň bn, čerň pn, Brilantní čerň BN
da: E151, Black pn (brilliant black bn)
de: E151, Brillantschwarz BN, Brilliantschwarz bn (schwarz pn), E 151, Brillantschwarz PN, Schwarz PN
el: E151, Λαμπρο μαυρο βν, μαυρο pn
es: E151, Negro brillante bn, negro pn, E 151
et: E151, Briljantmust bn, must pn
fi: E151, Briljanttimusta bn, musta pn, Briljanttimusta, E 151
fr: E151, Noir brillant BN, Noir PN, noir n°1, noir numéro 1, noir numéro un, Noir alimentaire 1, Naphtol black, CI 28440, CI Food Black 1, Food Black 1, CI Food Brown 1, Brillant Black BN, Brillant Black, Black PN, Noir brillant, Noir PN, Xylene Black F
hu: E151, Fekete PN, Brilliant Black PN
it: E151, Nero brillante bn, nero pn, C28H17N5Na4O14S4
lt: E151, Briliantinis juodasis bn, juodasis dažiklis pn, Juodasis PN
lv: E151, Briljanta melnais bn, melnais pn
mt: E151, Iswed brillanti bn, iswed pn
nl: E151, Briljantzwart bn, zwart pn, CI 28440
pl: E151, Czerń brylantowa bn, czerń pn, Czerń brylantowa PN, Czerń BN
pt: E151, Negro brilhante bn, negro pn, Negro brilhante
ro: E151, Negru briliant bn, negru pn
sk: E151, Brilantná čierna bn, čierna pn
sl: E151, Briljantno črno bn, črno pn
sv: E151, Briljantsvart bn, svart pn, E 151

en: E152, Black 7984, Food Black 2, carbon black
xx: E152
bg: E152, E152 food additive
cs: E152, E152 food additive
da: E152, Carbon black
de: E152, Kienruß
el: E152, E152 food additive
es: E152, negro de carbón, carbono negro, carbón negro
et: E152, Tahm
fi: E152, Musta 7984
fr: E152, Noir de carbone, Hydrocarbure, Noir 7984, Black 7984, Food Black 2, C.I. 27755
hu: E152, Fekete 7984, carbon black, szénfekete
it: E152, nero di carbone
lt: E152, E152 food additive
lv: E152, E152 food additive
mt: E152, E152 food additive
nl: E152, carbon black
pl: E152, Czerń 7984
pt: E152, E152 food additive
ro: E152, Cărbune negru
sk: E152, E152 food additive
sl: E152, E152 food additive
sv: E152, Kimrök

en: E153, Vegetable carbon
xx: E153
bg: E153, Растителен въглен
ca: E153, Carbó vegetal, carbo vegetal
cs: E153, Rostlinná uhlíková čerň
da: E153, Vegetabilsk kul
de: E153, Pflanzenkohle
el: E153, Φυτικος ανθρακας
es: E153, Carbón vegetal
et: E153, Taimne süsi
fi: E153, Kasviperäinen lääkehiili, lääkehiili, kasvihiili, Kasviperäistä lääkehiiltä, lääkehiiltä, kasvihiiltä
fr: E153, Charbon végétal médicinal, charbon végétal, noir végétal, vegetable carbon, charbon de bois, Charbon de bois
hr: E153
hu: E153, Növényi szén, Carbo medicinalis vegetabilis
it: E153, Carbone vegetale
lt: E153, Augalinės anglys
lv: E153, Augogle
mt: E153, Karbonju tal-ħxejjex
nb: E153, Biokull
nl: E153, Plantaardige koolstof
pl: E153, Węgiel roślinny
pt: E153, Carvão vegetal
ro: E153, Carbon vegetal
ru: E153, уголь растительный
sk: E153, Rastlinné uhlie
sl: E153, Rastlinsko oglje
sv: E153, Vegetabiliskt kol

en: E154, Brown FK, Kipper Brown
xx: E154
bg: E154, Кафяво FK
ca: E154, Marró FK, marro FK
cs: E154, Hněď FK
da: E154, Brun FK
de: E154, Braun FK
el: E154, Καστανό FK
es: E154, Marrón FK
et: E154, Pruun FK
fi: E154, Ruskea FK
fr: E154, Brun FK
hu: E154, Barna FK
it: E154, Marrone FK
lt: E154, Rudasis FK
lv: E154, Brūns FK
mt: E154, Marron FK
nl: E154, Bruin FK
pl: E154, Brąz FK
pt: E154, Castanho FK
ro: E154, Brun FK
sk: E154, Hnede FK
sl: E154, Rjava FK
sv: E154, Brun FK

en: E155, Brown ht, Chocolate brown HT
xx: E155
bg: E155, Кафяво ht
ca: E155, Marró HT, marro HT
cs: E155, Hněď ht
da: E155, Brown ht
de: E155, Braun ht, E 155
el: E155, Καστανο ht, Καστανό CI food 3
es: E155, Marrón ht, E 155, Pardo HT, Marrón chocolate HT
et: E155, Pruun ht
fi: E155, Ruskea ht, E 155, CI 20285
fr: E155, Brun chocolat HT, Brun ht
hu: E155, Barna HT, Csokoládébarna HT
it: E155, Bruno ht, Marrone HT, C27H18N4Na2O9S2
lt: E155, Rudasis ht, Maisto rudasis 3, Šokolado rudasis HT
lv: E155, Brūnais ht
mt: E155, Kannella ht
nl: E155, Bruin ht
pl: E155, Brąz ht
pt: E155, Castanho ht
ro: E155, Brun ht
sk: E155, Hnedá ht
sl: E155, Rjavo ht
sv: E155, Brun ht, E 155

en: E15x, E15x food additive
xx: E15x
bg: E15x, E15x food additive
cs: E15x, E15x food additive
da: E15x, E15x food additive
de: E15x, E15x food additive
el: E15x, E15x food additive
es: E15x, E15x food additive
et: E15x, E15x food additive
fi: E15x, CI 77266, Hiilimusta
fr: E15x, CI 77266, Black carbon, catégorie d'additifs de 152 à 153
hu: E15x, CI 77266
it: E15x, E15x food additive
lt: E15x, E15x food additive
lv: E15x, E15x food additive
mt: E15x, E15x food additive
nl: E15x, E15x food additive
pl: E15x, E15x food additive
pt: E15x, E15x food additive
ro: E15x, CI 77266, Categorie de aditivi a lui E152 și E153
sk: E15x, E15x food additive
sl: E15x, E15x food additive
sv: E15x, E15x food additive

en: E160, Carotenoids
xx: E160
bg: E160, Каротеноиди
ca: E160, Carotenoides
cs: E160, Karotenoidy
da: E160, Carotenoider, Karotenoid, Carotenoid, Blandede carotener
de: E160, Carotinoide
el: E160, Καροτενοειδή
es: E160, Carotenoides
et: E160, Karotenoidid
fi: E160, Karotenoidit, Karotenoideja
fr: E160, Caroténoïdes, carotènes, Caroténoïde, caroténoïdes mélangés
hr: E160
hu: E160, Karotinoidok
it: E160, Carotenoidi
ja: E160, カロチノイド色素, カロテノイド色素, カロチノイド, カロテノイド
lt: E160, Karotenoidai
lv: E160, E160 food additive
mt: E160, E160 food additive
nl: E160, E160 food additive
pl: E160, Karotenoidy
pt: E160, Carotenoides
ro: E160, Carotenoide
sk: E160, E160 food additive
sl: E160, E160 food additive
sv: E160, E160 food additive

en: E160a, carotene, carotene color
xx: E160a
bg: E160a, Каротин
ca: E160a, Carotè
cs: E160a, karoteny, karoten
da: E160a, Karotin, Karoten, Caroten
de: E160a, Carotine, Karotin, Carotin, Gamma-Carotin, Alpha-Carotin, γ-Carotin, α-Carotin
el: E160a, Καροτίνη, Καροτένιο, Γάμμα-καροτένιο, Άλφα-καροτένιο
es: E160a, Alfa-caroteno, Alfacaroteno, α-caroteno, Gamma-caroteno, Gammacaroteno, γ-caroteno, Carotina, Tetraterpeno
et: E160a, Karoteenid, Karotiinid, Karotiin, Karoteen
fi: E160a, Karoteeni, Karoteenia
fr: E160a, carotènes mélangés, carotène, γ-Carotène, gamma-carotène, Alphacarotene, Α-Carotène
hr: E160a, karoten, bojilo karoteni, karoteni
hu: E160a, Karotinok
it: E160a, Carotene, Carotina, Caroteni
ja: E160a, カロチン, カロテン, カロテン色素
lt: E160a, Karotinas
lv: E160a, E160a food additive
mt: E160a, E160a food additive
nb: E160a, Karotener
nl: E160a, caroteen, Carotenen
pl: E160a, karoteny, karoten
pt: E160a, Caroteno
ro: E160a, Caroten
ru: E160a, каротины, e160а
sk: E160a, Karotén
sl: E160a, E160a food additive
sv: E160a, Karoten, Karotener, Karotin, Alfakaroten
tr: E160a, karoten, karotenler

en: E160a(i), Beta-carotene, b-carotene, beta-carotene color
xx: E160a(i)
bg: E160a(i), Бета-каротин
cs: E160a(i), Beta-karoten
da: E160a(i), Beta-caroten, Betacaroten
de: E160a(i), Beta-Carotin, Betacarotin
el: E160a(i), Β-καροτενιο
es: E160a(i), Beta-caroteno, Betacaroteno, ß-caroteno
et: E160a(i), Beetakaroteen
fi: E160a(i), Beetakaroteeni, Beta-karoteeni, Betakaroteeni, Beetakaroteenia, Beta-karoteenia, Betakaroteenia, Betakarotiini
fr: E160a(i), Bêta-carotène, b-carotène
hr: E160a(i), beta karoten, beta carotene
hu: E160a(i), Béta-karotin
it: E160a(i), Beta-carotene
ja: E160a(i), β-カロチン, β-カロテン
lt: E160a(i), Beta karotenas
lv: E160a(i), Beta-karotīns
mt: E160a(i), Beta-karotên
nb: E160a(i), Betakaroten
nl: E160a(i), Bèta-caroteen, betacaroteen
pl: E160a(i), Beta-karoten, B-karoten, betakaroten
pt: E160a(i), Beta-caroteno
ro: E160a(i), Beta-caroten
sk: E160a(i), Beta-karotén
sl: E160a(i), Beta karoten
sv: E160a(i), betakaroten, beta-karoten, B-karoten
uk: E160a(i), бета-каротин

en: E160a(ii), Plant carotenes
xx: E160a(ii)
bg: E160a(ii), Растителни каротини
cs: E160a(ii), Rostlinné karoteny
da: E160a(ii), Plantecarotener
de: E160a(ii), Pflanzliche carotine
el: E160a(ii), Φυτικα καροτενια
es: E160a(ii), Carotenos de plantas
et: E160a(ii), Taimsed karoteenid, Toiduks kasutatavate taimede, porgandi, taimsete õlide, kõrreliste
fi: E160a(ii), Kasvikaroteenit, Kasvikaroteeneja
fr: E160a(ii), Carotènes végétaux, carotènes de plantes
hu: E160a(ii), Növényi karotinok
it: E160a(ii), Caroteni vegetali
lt: E160a(ii), Augaliniai karotenai
lv: E160a(ii), Augu karotīni
mt: E160a(ii), Karoteni tal-pjanti
nl: E160a(ii), Plantaardige carotenen
pl: E160a(ii), Karoteny otrzymywane z roślin, karoteny roślinne
pt: E160a(ii), Carotenos provenientes de plantas
ro: E160a(ii), Caroten din plante
sk: E160a(ii), Rastlinné karotény
sl: E160a(ii), Rastlinski karoteni
sv: E160a(ii), Karotener från växter

en: E160a(iii), Beta-carotene from blakeslea trispora
xx: E160a(iii)
bg: E160a(iii), Бета-каротин от blakeslea trispora
cs: E160a(iii), Beta-karoten z blakeslea trispora
da: E160a(iii), Beta-caroten fra blakeslea trispora
de: E160a(iii), Beta-carotin aus blakeslea trispora
el: E160a(iii), Β-καροτενιο από blakeslea trispora
es: E160a(iii), Beta-caroteno de blakeslea trispora
et: E160a(iii), Beetakaroteen saadud blakeslea trispora'st, Saadakse fermenteerimisel
fi: E160a(iii), Blakeslea trispora -sienestä saatu beta-karoteeni
fr: E160a(iii), Bêta-carotène issu de blakeslea trispora, β-carotène extrait de Blakeslea trispora
hu: E160a(iii), Béta-karotin blakeslea trisporából
it: E160a(iii), Beta-carotene derivato da blakeslea trispora
lt: E160a(iii), Beta karotenas iš blakeslea trispora, Gaunamas rauginimo būdu
lv: E160a(iii), Beta-karotīns no blakeslea trispora, Iegūst fermentācijas procesā
mt: E160a(iii), Beta-karotên minn blakeslea trispora
nl: E160a(iii), Bèta-caroteen uit blakeslea trispora
pl: E160a(iii), Beta-karoten otrzymywany z blakeslea trispora
pt: E160a(iii), Beta-caroteno de blakeslea trispora
ro: E160a(iii), Beta-caroten din blakeslea trispora
sk: E160a(iii), Beta-karotén z blakeslea trispora
sl: E160a(iii), Beta karoten iz blakeslea trispora
sv: E160a(iii), Betakaroten från blakeslea trispora

en: E160a(iv), Algal carotenes
xx: E160a(iv)
bg: E160a(iv), Каротини от водорасли
cs: E160a(iv), Karoteny z řas
da: E160a(iv), Algecarotener
de: E160a(iv), Algencarotine
el: E160a(iv), Καροτενια απο φυκη
es: E160a(iv), Carotenos de algas
et: E160a(iv), Vetikalised karoteenid
fi: E160a(iv), Leväkaroteenit, Leväkaroteeneja
fr: E160a(iv), Carotènes d'algues, β-carotène extrait d'algue
hu: E160a(iv), Algakarotinok
it: E160a(iv), Caroteni derivati dalle alghe
lt: E160a(iv), Dumblių karotenai
lv: E160a(iv), Aļģu karotīni
mt: E160a(iv), Karoteni mill-alga
nl: E160a(iv), Caroteen uit algen
pl: E160a(iv), Karoteny otrzymywane z alg
pt: E160a(iv), Carotenos provenientes de algas
ro: E160a(iv), Caroten din alge
sk: E160a(iv), Karotény z rias
sl: E160a(iv), Karoteni iz alg
sv: E160a(iv), Karotener från alger

en: E160b, Annatto, bixin, norbixin, roucou, achiote, annatto norbixin, annatto bixin, Orlean, Terre orellana, L. Orange, CI Natural Orange 4, annatto color
xx: E160b
ar: E160b, أناتو
bg: E160b, Анато, биксин, норбиксин (i), БИКСИН И НОРБИКСИН, анато норбиксин
ca: E160b, Arxiota, Bixina, norbixina de bixa, norbixina
cs: E160b, Annatto, bixin, norbixin
da: E160b, Annatto, Annattoekstrakter (bixin og norbixin), Annattoekstrakter, Bixin, Norbixin
de: E160b, Annatto (Bixin und Norbixin), Bixin und Norbixin, Annatto, Achote, Orlean, E 160b, Anatto, Bixin, Norbixin, Annatto Bixin, Annatto Norbixin
el: E160b, Αννατο, μπιξινη, νορμπιξινη (i)
eo: E160b, Biksa kolorigilo
es: E160b, Annato, bixina, norbixina, Achiote, anato
et: E160b, Annaato, biksiin, norbiksiin (i)
fi: E160b, Annatto, biksiini, norbiksiini, Annattoa, biksiiniä, norbiksiiniä
fr: E160b, Rocou, annatto, mélange de bixine et norbixine, Bixine, Norbixine, Annatto extract, Extraits de rocou, Extrait de graine de roucou, base de bixine, base de norbixine, CI 75120, Orange naturel CI n.4, Natural orange 4, CAS 1393-63-1, 89957-43-7, CAS 6983-79-5, Annatto seed extract, Bixa orellana seed extract, bixa orellana, achiote, Annatto G, bixine d'annatto, norbixine d'annatto
hr: E160b, annatto, e160b(i), e160b(ii), annato norbixin
hu: E160b, Annatto, bixin, norbixin
is: E160b, Annatto
it: E160b, Annatto, bissina, norbissina, C24H28O4
ja: E160b, アナトー色素, アナトー
jv: E160b, Annatto
kn: E160b, ಅನಾಟೋ
ko: E160b, 안나토
lt: E160b, Anatas, biksinas, norbiksinas
lv: E160b, Annato, biksīns, norbiksīns
mt: E160b, Annatto, biksin, norbiksin
nb: E160b, Annatto
nl: E160b, annatto, Anatto, Annato, annatto norbixine, annatto bixine, annatto norbixin, norbixin
pl: E160b, Annato, biksyna, norbiksyna, Annatto, annato norbiksyna
pt: E160b, Anato, bixina, norbixina, Colorau, Coloral, Urucu
ro: E160b, Annatto, bixină, norbixină (i)
ru: E160b, Annatto, аннато, экстракт анато
sk: E160b, Annatto, bixín, norbixín
sl: E160b, Anato, biksin, norbiksin
sr: E160b, Anato
sv: E160b, Annattoextrakt, bixin, norbixin i., Annatto, E 160b, Roucou
vi: E160b, Màu điều nhuộm
zh: E160b, 胭脂樹紅

en: E160b(i), Annatto bixin, Bixin
xx: E160b(i)

en: E160b(ii), Annatto norbixin, Norbixin
xx: E160b(ii)
fr: E160b(ii), norbixine de rocou

en: E160b(iii), Oil-extracted annatto
xx: E160b(iii)